Louisiana, session 2026, HB950.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:939 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§939. Pension protection and retirement income support and guidance program;
creation; distribution
A.(1) The legislature finds that seniors of this state constitute a valued and
growing segment of this state's population who have contributed substantially to its
economic and social fabric yet frequently rely upon pensions, retirement savings,
Social Security, and fixed incomes that are vulnerable to aggressive marketing of
complex financial products, economic hardships arising from increased longevity,
healthcare costs, inflation, financial exploitation, and other unforeseen
circumstances.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 950 ENROLLED
(2) It is therefore the purpose of this Act to safeguard the financial security,
dignity, and independence of these citizens by developing comprehensive, accessible
educational materials and resources for seniors and their caregivers on the effective
management of pensions and retirement income, clear explanations of financial
products commonly marketed to seniors, recognition and prevention of financial
exploitation, strategies for mitigating risks of financial hardship, and clear
explanations of financial products commonly marketed to seniors.
B. The office of elderly affairs may create the Pension Protection and
Retirement Income Support and Guidance program.
C. The program shall be for the benefit of persons of sixty years of age or
older in this state. The office of elderly affairs may develop program materials and
resources that provide practical guidance and empower senior citizens to make
informed decisions on relevant issues, including but not limited to all of the
following:
(1) Pension and retirement account protection.
(2) Income optimization and financial management.
(3) Information about financial products typically marketed to seniors.
(4) Strategies to reduce risks related to unexpected hardships or costs.
(5) Warning signs of scams, fraud, or exploitation targeting seniors, and
prevention tactics.
(6) Contact information for state agencies, legal aid organizations, dedicated
hotlines, or charities that can offer more detailed assistance if needed.
D. The office of elderly affairs may distribute these materials in an easy-to-
read format with simple navigation menus to seniors through existing websites or
other available platforms. The office of elderly affairs may distribute these materials
by any other means reasonably calculated to reach the seniors of this state.
E.(1) The office of elderly affairs shall implement the provisions of this
Section to the extent practicable within existing resources, and may utilize or link to
existing federal, nonprofit, or private educational resources to fulfill the purposes of
this Section.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 950 ENROLLED
(2) The provisions of this Section shall be implemented subject to the
availability of existing resources and shall not require additional appropriations.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.